utilities/dictionaries/ia_IA-Interlingua.aff
FLAG UTF-8
PFX ] Y 20
PFX ]   0 Y  .
PFX ]   0 Z  .
PFX ]   0 E  .
PFX ]   0 P  .
PFX ]   0 T  .
PFX ]   0 G  .
PFX ]   0 M  .
PFX ]   0 k  .
PFX ]   0 h  .
PFX ]   0 da .
PFX ]   0 d  .
PFX ]   0 c  .
PFX ]   0 m  .
PFX ]   0 µ  .
PFX ]   0 n  .
PFX ]   0 p  .
PFX ]   0 f  .
PFX ]   0 a  .
PFX ]   0 z  .
PFX ]   0 y  .

PFX [ Y 41
PFX [   0 yotta  .
PFX [   0 zetta  .
PFX [   0 exa    .
PFX [   0 peta   .
PFX [   0 tera   .
PFX [   0 giga   .
PFX [   0 mega   .
PFX [   0 kilo   .
PFX [   0 hecto  [^a]
PFX [   0 hect   a[^r]
PFX [   0 deca   .
PFX [   0 deci   .
PFX [   0 centi  .
PFX [   0 milli  .
PFX [   0 micro  .
PFX [   0 nano   .
PFX [   0 pico   .
PFX [   0 femto  .
PFX [   0 atto   .
PFX [   0 zepto  .
PFX [   0 yocto  .
PFX [   0 yotta- [aiyu]
PFX [   0 zetta- [aiyu]
PFX [   0 exa-   [aiyu]
PFX [   0 peta-  [aiyu]
PFX [   0 tera-  [aiyu]
PFX [   0 giga-  [aiyu]
PFX [   0 mega-  [aiyu]
PFX [   0 kilo-  [oiyu]
PFX [   0 hecto- [oiyu]
PFX [   0 deca-  [aiu]
PFX [   0 deci-  [aeiyou]
PFX [   0 centi- [aeiyou]
PFX [   0 milli- [aeiyou]
PFX [   0 micro- [oiyu]]
PFX [   0 nano-  [oiyu]]
PFX [   0 pico-  [oiyu]]
PFX [   0 femto- [oiyu]]
PFX [   0 atto-  [oiyu]]
PFX [   0 zepto- [oiyu]]
PFX [   0 yocto- [oiyu]]

PFX ) Y 8
PFX )   0 Ki [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Mi [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Gi [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Ti [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Pi [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Ei [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Zi [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Yi [Bbo]

PFX ( Y 16
PFX (   0 kibi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 mebi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 gigi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 tebi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 pebi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 exbi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 zebi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 yobi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 kibi-  oct
PFX (   0 mebi-  oct
PFX (   0 gigi-  oct
PFX (   0 tebi-  oct
PFX (   0 pebi-  oct
PFX (   0 exbi-  oct
PFX (   0 zebi-  oct
PFX (   0 yobi-  oct

PFX = Y 36
PFX =   contra  contra- contra[aiyu]
PFX =   extra   extra-  extra[aiyu]
PFX =   infra   infra-  infra[aiyu]
PFX =   intra   intra-  intra[aiyu]
PFX =   meta    meta-   meta[aiyu]
PFX =   para    para-   para[aiyu]
PFX =   supra   supra-  supra[aiyu]
PFX =   ultra   ultra-  ultra[aiyu]
PFX =   mega    mega-   mega[aiyu]
PFX =   bi      bi-     bi[aeiyou]
PFX =   archi   archi-  archi[aeiyou]
PFX =   anti    anti-   anti[aeiyou]
PFX =   mini    mini-   mini[aeiyou]
PFX =   multi   multi-  multi[aeiyou]
PFX =   pluri   pluri-  pluri[aeiyou]
PFX =   quasi   quasi-  quasi
PFX =   semi    semi-   semi[aeiyou]
PFX =   pre     pre-    pre[eiyu]
PFX =   re      re-     re[eiyu]
PFX =   tele    tele-   tele[eiyu]
PFX =   vice    vice-   vice[eiyu]
PFX =   auto    auto-   auto[oiyu]
PFX =   co      co-     co[oiyu]
PFX =   endo    endo-   endo[oiyu]
PFX =   exo     exo-    exo[oiyu]
PFX =   hypo    hypo-   hypo[oiyu]
PFX =   macro   macro-  macro[oiyu]
PFX =   micro   micro-  micro[oiyu]
PFX =   mono    mono-   mono[oiyu]
PFX =   neo     neo-    neo[oiyu]
PFX =   pro     pro-    pro[oiyu]
PFX =   proto   proto-  proto[oiyu]
PFX =   pseudo  pseudo- pseudo[oiyu]
PFX =   retro   retro-  retro[oiyu]
PFX =   poly    poly-   poly[aeiyou]
PFX =   post    post-   postt

SFX a Y 16
SFX a   a   sta/_F     ia      ds:ista
SFX a   e   sta/_F     ie      ds:ista
SFX a   o   sta/_F     io      ds:ista
SFX a   0   sta/_F     i       ds:ista
SFX a   a   ista/_F    [^i]a   ds:ista
SFX a   e   ista/_F    [^i]e   ds:ista
SFX a   o   ista/_F    [^i]o   ds:ista
SFX a   0   ista/_F    [^aeio] ds:ista
SFX a   a   stissime/_B     ia      ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   e   stissime/_B     ie      ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   o   stissime/_B     io      ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   0   stissime/_B     i       ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   a   istissime/_B    [^i]a   ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   e   istissime/_B    [^i]e   ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   o   istissime/_B    [^i]o   ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   0   istissime/_B    [^aeio] ds:ista ds:issim

SFX b Y 10
SFX b   r   bile/_F    ar       ds:a    ds:bil
SFX b   er  ibile/_F   er       ds:i    ds:bil
SFX b   r   bile/_F    ir       ds:i    ds:bil
SFX b   -   ibile/_F   t-       ds:0    ds:tibil
SFX b   -   ibile/_F   [sx]-    ds:0    ds:sibil
SFX b   r   bilissime/_B   ar      ds:a    ds:bil   ds:issim
SFX b   er  ibilissime/_B  er      ds:i    ds:bil   ds:issim
SFX b   r   bilissime/_B   ir      ds:i    ds:bil   ds:issim
SFX b   -   ibilissime/_B  t-      ds:0    ds:tibil ds:issim
SFX b   -   ibilissime/_B  [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sibil ds:issim

SFX c Y 5
SFX c   r   bilitate/_S     ar      ds:a    ds:bil      ds:itate
SFX c   er  ibilitate/_S    er      ds:i    ds:bil      ds:itate
SFX c   r   bilitate/_S     ir      ds:i    ds:bil      ds:itate
SFX c   -   ibilitate/_S    t-      ds:0    ds:tibil    ds:itate
SFX c   -   ibilitate/_S    [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sibil    ds:itate

SFX d Y 3
SFX d   r   ntia/_S     ar  ds:a    ds:ntia
SFX d   r   ntia/_S     er  ds:e    ds:ntia
SFX d   r   entia/_S    ir  ds:i    ds:entia

SFX e Y 8
SFX e   ar   eria/_S    [^c]ar  ds:eria
SFX e   a    eria/_S    [^c]a   ds:eria
SFX e   o    eria/_S    [^c]o   ds:eria
SFX e   ar   heria/_S   car     ds:eria
SFX e   a    heria/_S   ca      ds:eria
SFX e   o    heria/_S   co      ds:eria
SFX e   0    ria/_S     e       ds:eria
SFX e   0    eria/_S    [^aeor] ds:eria

SFX f Y 28
SFX f   0     o-/IKH       [lrchky]   po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     o-/IKH       [^a]n      po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     o-/IKH       [^eiuy]an  po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ian   o-/IKH       ian        po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   an    o-/IKH       [euy]an    po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   a     o-/IKH       a          po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   e     o-/IKH       [^si]e     po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   e     o-/IKH       [^e]se     po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ie    o-/IKH       ie         po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ese   o-/IKH       [^h]ese    po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ese   o-/IKH       [^c]hese   po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   hese  o-/IKH       chese      po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   i     o-/IKH       i          po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     -/IKH        [dto]      po:adj ds:-
SFX f   0     o/IKH       [lrchky]   po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     o/IKH       [^a]n      po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     o/IKH       [^eiuy]an  po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ian   o/IKH       ian        po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   an    o/IKH       [euy]an    po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   a     o/IKH       a          po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   e     o/IKH       [^si]e     po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   e     o/IKH       [^e]se     po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ie    o/IKH       ie         po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ese   o/IKH       [^h]ese    po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ese   o/IKH       [^c]hese   po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   hese  o/IKH       chese      po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   i     o/IKH       i          po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     0/IKH       [dto]      po:adj ds:-

SFX g Y 3
SFX g   r    ge/_S   ar   ds:age
SFX g   er   age/_S  er   ds:age
SFX g   ir   age/_S  ir   ds:age

SFX h Y 4
SFX h   a   ena/_S  a   ds:ena
SFX h   o   ena/_S  o   ds:ena
SFX h   0   na/_S   e   ds:ena
SFX h   i   ena/_S  i   ds:ena

SFX i Y 10
SFX i   r   tori/_B       ar       ds:a    ds:tori
SFX i   er  itori/_B      er       ds:i    ds:tori
SFX i   r   tori/_B       ir       ds:i    ds:tori
SFX i   -   ori/_B        t-       ds:0    ds:tori
SFX i   -   ori/_B        [sx]-    ds:0    ds:sori
SFX i   r   torissime/_B   ar       ds:a    ds:tori
SFX i   er  itorissime/_B  er       ds:i    ds:tori
SFX i   r   torissime/_B   ir       ds:i    ds:tori
SFX i   -   orissime/_B    t-       ds:0    ds:tori
SFX i   -   orissime/_B    [sx]-    ds:0    ds:sori

SFX j Y 5
SFX j   r   torio/_S    ar      ds:a    ds:torio
SFX j   er  itorio/_S   er      ds:i    ds:torio
SFX j   r   torio/_S    ir      ds:i    ds:torio
SFX j   -   orio/_S     t-      ds:0    ds:torio
SFX j   -   orio/_S     [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sorio

SFX k Y 5
SFX k   0   itate/_S    [auychklmnrt]   ds:itate
SFX k   -   itate/_S    [stx]-          ds:itate
SFX k   e   itate/_S    [^i]e           ds:itate
SFX k   0   etate/_S    i               ds:itate
SFX k   0   tate/_S     ie              ds:itate
